csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: miinik
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: miizhizhin
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: miizh
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [miizhishinaan,miizhishinaang]
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: miinadaanig
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: MISSING
     miizh+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: miinadaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhisiimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhisiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigodogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigodog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: nimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhisiim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhisiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigoog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhisiimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhisiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigobaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininimwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoom
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimiinigoom
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinooninaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiidog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinininaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigodogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigodog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: gimiinigoonaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinoon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigon
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigoog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinooninaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinininaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigobaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaasiidogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiidogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaasiidogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlObv: miinimaasiidogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaawaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaawaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaanaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaanaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlObv: miinimaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaasii'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaasii'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaasii'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlObv: miinimaasiiwa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaawaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaawaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaanaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaanaa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: miinimaawa'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaasiibane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiibane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaasiibane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlObv: miinimaasiibane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: nimiinimaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: gimiinimaawaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: gimiinimaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: omiinaawaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: omiinaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: nimiinimaanaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: gimiinimaanaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlObv: miinimaabane'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaadogena'
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaasiidogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaadogenan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaadog
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaadogenag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaadogenag
